Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 11. Miscellaneous.

§ 56-445.
Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.

§ 56-446.
Information to State Corporation Commission; penalty.

Every railroad company in this Commonwealth shall, at all times, on request, furnish to the State Corporation Commission any information required by it concerning the track and ancillary facilities or operation of the road, or any other report lawfully
required by the Commission and particularly copies of all of its timetables upon such road and other roads with which its business is connected. Copies of information provided to federal agencies are acceptable. Any railroad willfully
refusing or failing to furnish any such information in compliance with a Commission order or who willfully or unlawfully hinders, delays, or obstructs the Commission in the discharge of the duties imposed upon it by the Constitution,
or by law, shall, in the discretion of the Commission, be fined not less than $10 nor more than $1,000. Each day of such refusal, hindrance, delay, or obstruction shall be considered a separate offense. Fine amounts are to be specified
in the order.

History.
Code 1919, § 4002; 1996, cc. 114, 157.

Cross references.

For other provisions relating to the jurisdiction of the State Corporation Commission, see §§

12.1-38

, 56-43, 56-128.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 114 and 157 are identical, and, in the first sentence, deleted “or person operating a railroad” following “company,” substituted “track and ancillary facilities” for “physical condition, management,” and inserted “or any other
report lawfully required by the Commission” preceding “and particularly copies,” added the present second sentence, in the present third sentence, inserted “willfully” preceding “refusing” and substituted “in compliance with a Commission
order or who willfully or unlawfully hinders, delays, or obstructs the Commission in the discharge of the duties imposed upon it by the Constitution, or by law” for “to the Commission,” and added the fourth sentence.

§ 56-446.1.
Limitations on passenger rail transportation liability.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:“Authority” means a political subdivision of the Commonwealth that is comprised of two transportation commissions of the Commonwealth collectively engaged in providing, directly or indirectly,
passenger rail transportation services to the general public.“Claim” means a claim, action, suit, or request for damages, whether compensatory, punitive, or otherwise, made by or on behalf of any rail passenger arising out of the
provision of passenger rail services against an authority or a railroad, against a member of an authority’s governing body, or against a director, officer, employee, affiliate engaged in railroad operations, or agent of an authority
or a railroad, for property damage, personal injury, bodily injury, or death.“Passenger rail services” means the transportation of rail passengers by or on behalf of an authority, and all related services performed by a railroad
or an authority, including services performed by a railroad on behalf of an authority, pursuant to a contract with the authority arising from or in connection with the transportation of rail passengers.“Railroad” means a railroad
company or railroad corporation that has entered into any contracts or operating agreements of any kind with an authority for the provision of passenger rail services.

An authority may contract with any railroad to allocate financial responsibility for claims against the railroad or the authority arising from or in connection with any incident or accident of any kind related to the provision of passenger rail services,
which may include but not be limited to executing indemnity agreements, notwithstanding any other statutory, common law, public policy, or other prohibition against same, and regardless of the nature of the claim or the conduct
giving rise to such claim.

The aggregate liability of the authority and any applicable railroad, including the authority or railroad’s governing board, directors, officers, employees, affiliates engaged in railroad operations, or an agent of an authority, for all claims of rail
passengers arising from a single incident or accident of any kind involving passenger rail services or incidental services related thereto for property damage, personal injury, bodily injury, and death shall be limited to $250
million per single incident or accident.

This section shall not affect the damages that may be recovered under the Federal Employers’ Liability Act of 1908 (45 U.S.C. § 51 et seq.), as amended.

This section shall not affect the damages that may be recovered for a claim if it can be shown that the accident or injury occurred as a result of willful and wanton conduct, felonious criminal conduct, or gross negligence on the part of the railroad.

The limitation on aggregate liability provided in this section shall be modified each year, beginning in January, 2011, and continuing each January thereafter, by adjusting the amount of the limitation by a percentage equal to the percentage change in
the medical care component of the Consumer Price Index, as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, over that component published for the previous December.

The Virginia Division of Risk Management shall be designated to examine the history of claims made and amounts recovered against the Virginia Railway Express arising from or in connection with the provision of passenger rail service in the Commonwealth,
and to provide a complete review of those findings to the General Assembly by November 30, 2010.

History.
2006, cc. 774, 807.

§§ 56-447 through 56-451.
Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.

§ 56-451.1.
Keeping unused tracks in place.

If a railroad company discontinues operations on all or any portion of its line of railroad (other than yard tracks, passing sidings, or tracks unneeded because of the diversion of traffic over parallel or other substitute tracks), it shall notify the
governing body of any city, town or county directly served by the portion of line so discontinued. Retention of such track in place shall be in accordance with federal rules and regulations.

History.
1960, c. 443; 1996, cc. 114, 157.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1960 act having assigned no number.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 114 and 157 are identical, and rewrote this section which formerly read: “If a railroad company shall cease to operate all or any portion of its line of railroad (other than yard tracks, passing sidings, or tracks unneeded because
of the diversion of traffic over parallel or other substitute tracks), it shall notify the governing body of any city, town or county directly served by the portion of line so discontinued at least thirty days prior to the removal
of the track from the roadbed. Upon giving such notice the railroad company may by agreement with such local governing body, or with a chamber of commerce or other nonprofit organization, leave such track in place or sell the same
to such local governing body, chamber of commerce or other nonprofit organization, to be held in place pending reestablishment of rail service thereon and during the period of time when such track shall so remain in place and unused,
the State Corporation Commission shall treat the roadbed on which the same is located as unimproved property and assess it accordingly.”

§ 56-451.2.
Repealed by Acts 1987, c. 495.